Maryland, session 2026, HB1050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following words have
the meanings indicated.
(f) “Department” means the State Department of Education.
7–455.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DONOR REGISTRY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–501 OF THE
ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE.
(3) “PROCUREMENT ORGANIZATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
4–501 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT DEVELOPS, UPDATES, OR APPROVES
CURRICULUM GUIDANCE, INSTRUCTIONAL RESOURCES, OR PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT MATERIALS REGARDING ORGAN, EYE, AND TISSUE DONATION FOR
USE BY COUNTY BOARDS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH:
(1) THE QUALIFIED NONPROFIT ENTITY THAT OPERATES THE DONOR
REGISTRY UNDER § 4–516 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE; AND
(2) PROCUREMENT ORGANIZATIONS SERVING IN THE STATE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE OR REFERENCE EXISTING EDUCATIONAL
MATERIALS THAT WERE PREVIOUSLY DEVELOPED BY OR BEING USED BY THE DONOR
REGISTRY OR A PROCUREMENT ORGANIZATION IF THE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS
ARE:
(1) AGE APPROPRIATE;
(2) EVIDENCE–BASED AND MEDICALLY ACCURATE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1050 3
(3) CONSISTENT WITH THE MARYLAND REVISED UNIFORM
ANATOMICAL GIFT ACT UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE ESTATES AND TRUSTS
ARTICLE.
Article – Estates and Trusts
4–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Donor registry” means a database that contains records of anatomical gifts
and amendments to or revocations of anatomical gifts as provided in § 4–516 of this subtitle.
(r) “Organ procurement organization” means a person designated by the
Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services as an organ
procurement organization.
(v) “Procurement organization” means an eye bank, an organ procurement
organization, or a tissue bank.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.